District of Columbia statutes.
47-1814.03

Repealed

Persons engaging in a profession — Posting for inspection.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 358, ch. 258, art. I, title XIV, § 3
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 80, ch. 154, § 17
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(b), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-1814.3.
1973 Ed., § 47-1591b.